nb: Utsmykningsteknikk: Applikasjon; Bandhani (knytebatikk); Perlearbeid; Blokktrykk; Hullsøm; Digitaltrykk; Broderi; Folietrykk; Håndmalt; Kalamkari-trykk; Blondearbeid; Speilarbeid; Lappeteknikk; Paljettarbeid; Shibori-farging; Steinarbeid; Swarovski-pynt; Trådarbeid; Zari-arbeid; Annet
el: Τεχνική διακόσμησης: Απλικέ; Tie-dye Bandhani; Χάντρες; Block print; Αζούρ (cutwork); Ψηφιακή εκτύπωση; Κέντημα; Εκτύπωση foil; Ζωγραφισμένο στο χέρι; Kalamkari print; Δαντέλα; Κέντημα με καθρεφτάκια; Πάτσγουορκ; Κέντημα με πούλιες; Βαφή shibori; Κέντημα με πέτρες; Διακόσμηση Swarovski; Κέντημα με νήμα; Κέντημα zari; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tehnica de înfrumusețare: Aplicație; Tie-dye Bandhani; Broderie cu mărgele; Imprimeu cu bloc de lemn; Broderie decupată; Imprimeu digital; Broderie; Imprimeu cu folie metalică; Pictat manual; Imprimeu Kalamkari; Broderie cu dantelă; Broderie cu oglinzi; Mozaic textil (Patchwork); Broderie cu paiete; Vopsire Shibori; Aplicații cu pietre; Aplicații cu cristale Swarovski; Broderie cu fir; Broderie Zari; Altele
pt-BR: Técnica de enfeite/adorno: Aplique; Tie-dye Bandhani; Trabalho em miçangas; Impressão em bloco; Bordado rechilieu; Impressão digital; Bordado; Impressão com foil; Pintado à mão; Impressão Kalamkari; Trabalho em renda; Trabalho com espelhos; Patchwork; Trabalho com lantejoulas; Tingimento Shibori; Trabalho com pedrarias; Aplicação de cristais Swarovski; Bordado com linha; Trabalho em Zari; Outro
sk-SK: Technika zdobenia: Aplikácia; Bandhani batikovanie; Koráliková výšivka; Bloková tlač; Rišelié; Digitálna tlač; Výšivka; Fóliová tlač; Ručne maľované; Tlač kalamkari; Čipkovanie; Zrkadielková výšivka; Patchwork; Flitrová výšivka; Batikovanie shibori; Kamienková výšivka; Zdobenie kryštálmi Swarovski; Niťová výšivka; Výšivka zari; Iné
sl-SI: Tehnika okraševanja: Aplikacija; Bandhani (tehnika barvanja zavezovanjem); Vezenje s perlicami; Tisk z bloki; Izrezano vezenje; Digitalni tisk; Vezenje; Tisk s folijo; Ročno poslikano; Tisk kalamkari; Čipke; Vezenje z ogledalci; Krpanka; Vezenje z bleščicami; Barvanje shibori; Vezenje s kamenčki; Okrasitev s kristali Swarovski; Vezenje z nitjo; Vezenje zari; Drugo
zh-CN: 装饰工艺: 贴花; Bandhani 扎染; 串珠工艺; 雕版印花; 镂花刺绣; 数码印花; 刺绣; 烫金印花; 手绘; Kalamkari 印花; 蕾丝工艺; 镜面刺绣; 拼布; 亮片工艺; Shibori 绞染; 镶石工艺; Swarovski 点缀; 线绣; Zari 金银线绣; 其他
ru: Техника декора: Аппликация; Узелковое окрашивание бандхани; Вышивка бисером; Блочная печать; Ришелье (прорезная вышивка); Цифровая печать; Вышивка; Печать фольгой; Ручная роспись; Принт каламкари; Кружево; Вышивка с зеркалами; Пэчворк; Вышивка пайетками; Окрашивание шибори; Отделка камнями; Отделка кристаллами Swarovski; Вышивка нитью; Вышивка зари; Другое
ja: 装飾技法: アップリケ; 絞り染め (バンダニ); ビーズワーク; ブロックプリント; カットワーク; デジタルプリント; 刺繍; 箔プリント; 手描き; カラムカリプリント; レースワーク; ミラーワーク; パッチワーク; スパンコールワーク; 絞り染め (シボリ); ストーンワーク; スワロフスキー装飾; 糸刺繍; ザリ刺繍; その他
ko: 장식 기법: 아플리케; 반다니 홀치기염색; 비즈 장식; 블록 프린트; 컷워크; 디지털 프린트; 자수; 포일 프린트; 핸드페인팅; 칼람카리 프린트; 레이스 장식; 거울 장식; 패치워크; 스팽글 장식; 시보리 염색; 스톤 장식; 스와로브스키 장식; 스레드 장식; 자리 장식; 기타
it: Tecnica di decorazione: Appliqué; Tie-dye Bandhani; Lavorazione con perline; Stampa a blocchi; Intaglio; Stampa digitale; Ricamo; Stampa a lamina; Dipinto a mano; Stampa Kalamkari; Lavorazione in pizzo; Lavorazione a specchio; Patchwork; Lavorazione con paillettes; Tintura shibori; Lavorazione con pietre; Applicazioni Swarovski; Lavorazione a filo; Lavorazione Zari; Altro
da: Udsmykningsteknik: Applikation; Bandhani tie-dye; Perlearbejde; Bloktryk; Hulsøm; Digitaltryk; Broderi; Folieprint; Håndmalet; Kalamkari-tryk; Blondearbejde; Spejlarbejde; Patchwork; Pailletarbejde; Shibori-farvning; Stenarbejde; Swarovski-udsmykning; Trådarbejde; Zari-arbejde; Andet
pl: Technika zdobienia: Aplikacja; Bandhani (tie-dye); Zdobienie koralikami; Druk klockowy; Haft wycinany (richelieu); Druk cyfrowy; Haft; Druk foliowy; Ręcznie malowane; Druk Kalamkari; Zdobienie koronką; Haft lusterkowy; Patchwork; Zdobienie cekinami; Barwienie Shibori; Zdobienie kamieniami; Zdobienie kryształkami Swarovski; Zdobienie nićmi; Haft Zari; Inne
es: Técnica de embellecimiento: Aplique; Teñido anudado bandhani; Trabajo con cuentas; Impresión en bloque; Calado; Impresión digital; Bordado; Impresión metalizada; Pintado a mano; Impresión kalamkari; Trabajo de encaje; Trabajo con espejos; Patchwork; Trabajo con lentejuelas; Teñido shibori; Trabajo con piedras; Adorno Swarovski; Trabajo con hilo; Trabajo con zari; Otro
fr: Technique d’ornementation: Appliqué; Teinture tie-dye Bandhani; Broderie de perles; Impression au bloc; Broderie découpée; Impression numérique; Broderie; Impression métallisée; Peint à la main; Impression Kalamkari; Ouvrage en dentelle; Travail de miroirs; Patchwork; Broderie de paillettes; Teinture Shibori; Incrustation de pierres; Ornement Swarovski; Ouvrage de fil; Broderie Zari; Autre
zh-TW: 裝飾技法: 貼花; Bandhani 紮染; 串珠刺繡; 木刻印花; 鏤空刺繡; 數位印花; 刺繡; 燙金印花; 手工彩繪; Kalamkari 印花; 蕾絲裝飾; 鏡片刺繡; 拼布; 亮片刺繡; 絞染; 鑲石; 施華洛世奇水鑽裝飾; 彩線刺繡; Zari 金銀線刺繡; 其他
nl: Versiering techniek: Applicatie; Bandhani tie-dye; Kralenwerk; Blokdruk; Opengewerkt borduurwerk; Digitale print; Borduurwerk; Folieprint; Handbeschilderd; Kalamkari-print; Kantwerk; Spiegelwerk; Patchwork; Paillettenwerk; Shibori-verf; Steenwerk; Swarovski-versiering; Draadwerk; Zari-werk; Overige
de: Verzierungstechnik: Applikation; Bandhani-Batik; Perlenstickerei; Blockdruck; Durchbruchstickerei; Digitaldruck; Stickerei; Foliendruck; Handbemalt; Kalamkari-Druck; Spitzenarbeit; Spiegelarbeit; Patchwork; Paillettenarbeit; Shibori-Batik; Schmucksteinarbeit; Swarovski-Verzierung; Fadenarbeit; Zari-Arbeit; Sonstige
vi: Kỹ thuật trang trí: Appliqué; Nhuộm buộc Bandhani; Đính hạt; In mộc bản; Khoét lỗ (Cutwork); In kỹ thuật số; Thêu; In ép nhũ; Vẽ tay; In Kalamkari; Phối ren; Đính gương; Chắp vá (Patchwork); Đính sequin; Nhuộm Shibori; Đính đá; Đính pha lê Swarovski; Thêu chỉ nổi; Thêu sợi Zari; Khác
sv: Utsmyckningsteknik: Applikation; Bandhani-knytbatik; Pärlarbete; Blocktryck; Utklippssöm; Digitaltryck; Broderi; Folietryck; Handmålat; Kalamkari-tryck; Spetsarbete; Spegelarbete; Lappteknik; Paljettarbete; Shibori-färgning; Stenarbete; Swarovski-utsmyckning; Tråddekoration; Zari-arbete; Övrigt
tr: Süsleme tekniği: Aplike; Bandhani batik; Boncuk işi; Blok baskı; Kesme işi; Dijital baskı; Nakış; Folyo baskı; El boyaması; Kalamkari baskı; Dantel işi; Ayna işi; Kırkyama; Payet işi; Shibori boyama; Taş işi; Swarovski süslemesi; İp işi; Zari işi; Diğer
th: เทคนิคการตกแต่ง: งานปะติด; มัดย้อมแบบ Bandhani; งานลูกปัด; พิมพ์บล็อก; งานฉลุ; พิมพ์ดิจิทัล; งานปัก; พิมพ์ฟอยล์; เพ้นท์ด้วยมือ; พิมพ์ลาย Kalamkari; งานลูกไม้; งานปักกระจก; งานต่อผ้า; งานปักเลื่อม; ย้อมแบบชิโบริ; งานประดับหิน; ประดับด้วยคริสตัล Swarovski; งานปักด้าย; งานปักดิ้น; อื่นๆ
hu: Díszítési technika: Rátét; Bandhani batikolás; Gyöngyhímzés; Dúcnyomás; Richelieu hímzés; Digitális nyomtatás; Hímzés; Fólianyomás; Kézzel festett; Kalamkari nyomás; Csipkeverés; Tükrös hímzés; Foltvarrás; Flitteres hímzés; Shibori festés; Köves hímzés; Swarovski díszítés; Fonalhímzés; Zari hímzés; Egyéb
en: Embellishment technique: Appliqué; Bandhani tie-dye; Bead work; Block print; Cutwork; Digital print; Embroidery; Foil print; Hand-painted; Kalamkari print; Lace work; Mirror work; Patchwork; Sequin work; Shibori dye; Stone work; Swarovski embellishment; Thread work; Zari work; Other
pt-PT: Técnica de embelezamento: Appliqué; Tie-dye Bandhani; Trabalho com contas; Estampagem com blocos; Bordado de recorte; Estampagem digital; Bordado; Estampagem foil; Pintado à mão; Estampagem Kalamkari; Trabalho em renda; Trabalho com espelhos; Patchwork; Trabalho com lantejoulas; Tingimento Shibori; Trabalho com pedras; Enfeite Swarovski; Trabalho de fio; Trabalho em Zari; Outro
bg-BG: Техника на декорация: Апликация; Връзване и боядисване (бандхани); Работа с мъниста; Печат с блокче; Рязана бродерия; Дигитален печат; Бродерия; Печат с фолио; Ръчно рисувано; Печат каламкари; Работа с дантела; Вграждане на огледалца; Пачуърк; Работа с пайети; Шибори багрене; Вграждане на камъни; Украса Swarovski; Везба с конци; Златна бродерия (зари); Други
hr-HR: Tehnika ukrašavanja: Aplikacija; Bandhani tie-dye; Rad s perlicama; Blok tisak; Rupičasti vez; Digitalni tisak; Vez; Tisak folijom; Ručno oslikano; Kalamkari tisak; Čipka; Vez s ogledalcima; Patchwork; Rad sa šljokicama; Shibori tehnika bojenja; Rad s kamenčićima; Swarovski ukrasi; Rad s koncem; Zari vez; Ostalo
fi: Koristelutekniikka: Applikointi; Bandhani-solmuvärjäys; Helmikirjonta; Leimasinpainatus; Reikäkirjonta; Digitaalinen painatus; Kirjonta; Foliopainatus; Käsinmaalattu; Kalamkari-painatus; Pitsityö; Peilikirjonta; Tilkkutyö; Paljettikirjonta; Shibori-värjäys; Kivikoristelu; Swarovski-koristelu; Lankakirjonta; Zari-kirjonta; Muu
lt-LT: Dekoravimo technika: Aplikacija; Bandhani batika; Siuvinėjimas karoliukais; Spausdinimas blokais; Ažūrinis siuvinėjimas; Skaitmeninė spauda; Siuvinėjimas; Spauda folija; Tapyta rankomis; Kalamkari spauda; Nėriniai; Siuvinėjimas veidrodėliais; Durtinė technika (patchwork); Siuvinėjimas blizgučiais; Shibori dažymas; Siuvinėjimas akmenukais; Papuošimai „Swarovski“ kristalais; Siuvinėjimas siūlais; Siuvinėjimas „zari“ siūlais; Kita
cs: Technika zdobení: Aplikace; Batika Bandhani; Vyšívání korálky; Blokový tisk; Prostřihovaná výšivka; Digitální tisk; Výšivka; Fóliový tisk; Ručně malované; Tisk Kalamkari; Krajkování; Výšivka se zrcátky; Patchwork; Pošívání flitry; Batika Shibori; Zdobení kamínky; Zdobení krystaly Swarovski; Zdobení nitěmi; Výšivka Zari; Jiné